Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: DIVISION I DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP Section 1. GENERAL FUND. 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For purposes of supporting the department, including its divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; for salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20,377,294 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 420.00 2. Of the amount appropriated in subsection 1, the following amount is transferred to Iowa state university of science and technology, to be used for the universityâs midwest grape and wine industry institute: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 325,000 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department Senate File 646, p. 2 of management. The report shall describe in detail the expenditure of moneys appropriated in this section to support the departmentâs administration, regulation, and programs. Sec. 2. UNCLAIMED PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING WINNINGS ââ HORSE AND DOG RACING. There is appropriated from the moneys available under section 99D.13 to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For purposes of supporting the departmentâs administration and enforcement of horse and dog racing law pursuant to section 99D.22 , including for salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 305,516 Sec. 3. RENEWABLE FUEL INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ MOTOR FUEL INSPECTION. There is appropriated from the renewable fuel infrastructure fund created in section 159A.16 to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For purposes of the inspection of motor fuel, including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 Sec. 4. SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND ââ BUTCHERY INNOVATION AND REVITALIZATION PROGRAM. 1. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled worker and job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For support of the butchery innovation and revitalization program established pursuant to 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1148, section 28, to award financial assistance to eligible businesses for projects based on criteria described in section 15E.370: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249,695 Senate File 646, p. 3 2. The department may use not more than 5 percent of the moneys appropriated in subsection 1 to pay for the costs of administering the program described in subsection 1. 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in subsection 1 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027. Sec. 5. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND TO DEPARTMENT. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. DAIRY REGULATION a. For purposes of performing functions pursuant to section 192.109 , including conducting a survey of grade âAâ milk and certifying the results to the secretary of agriculture: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 189,196 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 2. LOCAL FOOD AND FARM PROGRAM a. For purposes of supporting the local food and farm program pursuant to chapter 267A : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 b. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, $50,000 is allocated to the department to support a project conducted by Iowa state university of science and technology to study the ability of the choose Iowa food program, created under section 187.304, as enacted by this Act, to serve rural grocers. c. The department shall enter into a cost-sharing agreement with Iowa state university of science and technology to support the local food and farm program coordinator position as part of the universityâs cooperative extension service in agriculture and home economics pursuant to chapter 267A . d. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in Senate File 646, p. 4 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 3. AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION a. For purposes of allocating moneys to an Iowa association affiliated with a national organization that promotes agricultural education providing for future farmers: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 4. FOREIGN ANIMAL DISEASES AFFLICTING LIVESTOCK For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness and response fund created in section 163.3B for purposes designated in that section: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,050,000 5. FARMERS WITH DISABILITIES PROGRAM a. For purposes of supporting a program for farmers with disabilities: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 230,000 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be used for the public purpose of providing a grant to a national nonprofit organization with over 80 years of experience in assisting children and adults with disabilities and special needs. The moneys shall be used to support a nationally recognized program that began in 1986 and has been replicated in at least 30 other states, but is not available through any other entity in this state, and that provides assistance to farmers with disabilities in all 99 counties to allow the farmers to remain in their own homes and be gainfully engaged in farming through provision of agricultural worksite and home modification consultations, peer support services, services to families, information and referral, and equipment loan services. c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the Senate File 646, p. 5 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 6. LOESS HILLS DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND a. For deposit in the loess hills development and conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.2 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, $260,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs hungry canyons account. (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this paragraph may be used for administrative costs. c. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, $40,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs loess hills alliance account. (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 7. SOUTHERN IOWA DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND a. For deposit in the southern Iowa development and conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.12: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in this subsection may be used for administrative costs. 8. GRAIN REGULATION For the administration and enforcement of chapters 203 and 203C , including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350,000 9. CHOOSE IOWA FUND a. For deposit in the choose Iowa fund created in section 187.201: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,813,000 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the department shall use at least $500,000 to support the value-added agricultural grant program created in section 187.321. (2) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the department may use up to $813,000 to support the choose Iowa promotional program as provided in chapter 187, subchapter III, Senate File 646, p. 6 part 1. (3) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the department shall use at least $500,000 to support the dairy innovation and revitalization program created in section 187.311. c. The department may increase or decrease the amount of moneys used to support a program described in paragraph âbâ based on the amount of moneys awarded to persons participating in the program. The department shall publish a notice of the departmentâs action to increase or decrease the amount on the departmentâs internet site where the programs are advertised at least thirty days prior to the day that the department takes such action. 10. CHOOSE IOWA FOOD PURCHASING PROGRAM a. For purposes of supporting the choose Iowa food purchasing program to assist eligible participants in purchasing qualified food products pursuant to section 187.331, as enacted by this Act: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 187.331 Choose Iowa food purchasing program. 1. There is created within the department a choose Iowa food purchasing program. 2. The department shall administer the program according to all of the following: a. A farm or business that owns or operates the farm source shall be given a preference to participate in the program if the farm or business is currently participating in the choose Iowa promotional program as provided in this part 1 of subchapter III. Otherwise, a farm or business may participate in the program if the farm or business has applied to participate in the choose Iowa promotional program and the department determines that the application will be approved. b. An eligible participant is limited to any Iowa food bank Senate File 646, p. 7 or an Iowa emergency feeding organization, recognized by the department. c. A qualified food product is limited to meat and poultry, dairy products, grains, flour, eggs, honey, and produce. 3. a. Of the moneys appropriated to support the program in a fiscal year, not more than two hundred thousand dollars shall be used to reimburse Iowa food banks and Iowa emergency feeding organizations. b. An eligible participant shall be reimbursed on a matching basis with the department contributing one dollar for every one dollar expended by the eligible participant. c. An Iowa food bank or Iowa emergency feeding organization shall not receive more than fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year for participating in the program. 4. The department may use not more than five percent of the moneys appropriated to support the program in a fiscal year to pay for the costs of administering the program. 5. The department shall prepare and submit a report regarding its findings and recommendations to the governor and general assembly not later than January 15 of each year. 6. This section is repealed July 1, 2030. Sec. 7. DIRECTIONS TO CODE EDITOR. The Code editor shall designate section 187.331, as enacted in this division of this Act, as a new part within chapter 187, subchapter III, entitled âChoose Iowa Food Purchasing Programâ. DIVISION II DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES Sec. 8. GENERAL FUND. 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For purposes of supporting the department, including its divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; for salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,816,738 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1,145.95 Senate File 646, p. 8 2. Of the number of full-time equivalent positions authorized to the department pursuant to subsection 1, 50.00 full-time equivalent positions shall be allocated by the department for seasonal employees for purposes of providing maintenance, upkeep, and sanitary services at state parks. This subsection shall not impact conservation officer, park ranger, or park manager positions within the department. 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department of management. The report shall describe in detail the expenditure of moneys appropriated under this section to support the departmentâs administration, regulation, and programs. Sec. 9. STATE FISH AND GAME PROTECTION FUND ââ REGULATION AND ADVANCEMENT OF OUTDOOR ACTIVITIES. 1. There is appropriated from the state fish and game protection fund created pursuant to section 456A.17 to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For purposes of supporting the regulation or advancement of hunting, fishing, or trapping, or the protection, propagation, restoration, management, or harvest of fish or wildlife, including for administration, regulation, law enforcement, and programs; and for salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, and miscellaneous purposes: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 51,404,790 2. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may use the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish and game protection fund to provide for the funding of health and life insurance premium payments from unused sick leave balances of conservation peace officers employed in a protection occupation who retire, pursuant to section 97B.49B . 3. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may use the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish and game protection fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as is necessary to fund salary adjustments for departmental employees for which the Senate File 646, p. 9 general assembly has made an operating budget appropriation in subsection 1. Sec. 10. GROUNDWATER PROTECTION FUND ââ WATER QUALITY. There is appropriated from the groundwater protection fund created in section 455E.11 to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, from those moneys that are not allocated pursuant to that section, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For purposes of supporting the departmentâs protection of the stateâs groundwater, including for administration, regulation, and programs, and for salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, and miscellaneous purposes: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,455,850 Sec. 11. SPECIAL SNOWMOBILE FUND ââ SNOWMOBILE PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the special snowmobile fund created under section 321G.7 to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For purposes of administering and enforcing the state snowmobile programs: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 Sec. 12. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND TO DEPARTMENT. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY a. For purposes of supporting floodplain management and dam safety: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,510,000 b. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to $400,000 may be used by the department to acquire or install stream gages for purposes of tracking and predicting flood events and for compiling necessary data to improve flood frequency analysis. Senate File 646, p. 10 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 2. FORESTRY HEALTH MANAGEMENT a. For purposes of providing for forestry health management programs: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 525,000 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 3. STATE PARK OPERATIONS For supporting operations at state parks, including maintenance and repair of grounds and facilities: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 4. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE For structural and infrastructural repairs in state parks: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 DIVISION III IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY Sec. 13. SPECIAL GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to Iowa state university of science and technology for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. VETERINARY DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY a. For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic laboratory, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,799,898 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 51.00 b. (1) Iowa state university of science and technology shall not reduce the amount that it allocates to support the college of veterinary medicine from any other source due to the Senate File 646, p. 11 appropriation made in this subsection. (2) Subparagraph (1) does not apply to a reduction made to support the college of veterinary medicine if the same percentage of reduction imposed on the college of veterinary medicine is also imposed on all of Iowa state university of science and technologyâs budget units. c. If by June 30, 2026, Iowa state university of science and technology fails to allocate the moneys appropriated in this subsection to the college of veterinary medicine in accordance with this subsection, the moneys appropriated in this subsection for that fiscal year shall revert to the general fund of the state. 2. MANAGEMENT OF PRIVATE FORESTS a. For purposes of supporting the Iowa cooperative extension service in agriculture and home economics in providing technical support to landowners and loggers regarding the management of private forests in northeast Iowa, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.00 b. The department of natural resources shall cooperate with the Iowa cooperative extension service in agriculture and home economics in administering this subsection. 3. LIVESTOCK DISEASE RESEARCH a. For deposit in the livestock disease research fund created in section 267.8 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 291,390 b. Moneys appropriated under this subsection shall be used by Iowa state university of science and technology to support animal disease research in areas of importance to livestock producers. Sec. 14. IOWA NUTRIENT RESEARCH FUND ââ VETERINARY DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY. Notwithstanding section 466B.46, there is appropriated from the Iowa nutrient research fund created in section 466B.46 to Iowa state university of science and technology for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary Senate File 646, p. 12 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic laboratory: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 DIVISION IV STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA Sec. 15. IOWAâS CENTER FOR AGRICULTURAL SAFETY AND HEALTH (I-CASH). 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For supporting the operations of Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and health, as part of the universityâs college of public health, and in cooperation with the department of agriculture and land stewardship, to anticipate, recognize, and prevent occupational illness and injury among members of the agricultural community: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 128,154 2. a. As a condition of the appropriation made in subsection 1, the state university of Iowa shall retain the director of Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and health employed on the effective date of this division of this Act for at least the same number of hours for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, as worked by the director during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. b. As a condition of the appropriation made in subsection 1, the state university of Iowa shall not reduce the amount allocated to support Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and health from any other source due to the appropriation made in subsection 1. 3. If by June 30, 2026, the state university of Iowa fails to use the moneys appropriated in subsection 1 in accordance with the purposes and conditions of subsections 1 and 2, any unencumbered or unobligated moneys appropriated in subsection 1 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, shall revert to the general fund of the state. In addition, if moneys revert as required pursuant to section 8.33 , the state university of Iowa shall transfer to the Senate File 646, p. 13 general fund of the state from any otherwise unencumbered or unobligated moneys from any other general fund appropriation or from any moneys available from other funding sources an amount equal to the amount appropriated in subsection 1 less any amount that reverted to the general fund of the state pursuant to section 8.33 . Sec. 16. IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY ââ GROUNDWATER PLANNING AND RESOURCE ASSESSMENT PROJECT. 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For purposes of supporting a groundwater planning and resource assessment project to be administered by the Iowa geological survey of the state as created pursuant to section 456.1: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 2. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used by the Iowa geological survey to map and assess the condition of this stateâs aquifers. The Iowa geological survey may measure the volume of groundwater that is available for various uses, the current and predicted allocations of groundwater to support those uses, the recharge rate for the aquifers, and the development of models for budgeting this stateâs water resources. 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in subsection 1 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated in subsection 1. DIVISION V ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP. There is appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes Senate File 646, p. 14 designated: 1. CONSERVATION RESERVE ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM (CREP) a. For the conservation reserve enhancement program to restore and construct wetlands for the purposes of intercepting tile line runoff, reducing nutrient loss, improving water quality, and enhancing agricultural production practices: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and implementation of soil and water conservation practices. c. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may use moneys appropriated in this subsection, in combination with other appropriate environment first fund appropriations, for cost sharing to match United States department of agriculture, natural resources conservation service, wetlands reserve enhancement program (WREP) funding available to Iowa. 2. WATERSHED PROTECTION a. For continuation of a program that provides multiobjective resource protections for flood control, water quality, erosion control, and natural resource conservation: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 3. CONSERVATION RESERVE PROGRAM (CRP) a. To encourage and assist farmers in enrolling in and the implementation of the federal conservation reserve program and to work with them to enhance their revegetation efforts to improve water quality and habitat: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 4. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION a. For use by the department in providing for soil and water conservation: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,325,000 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, for Senate File 646, p. 15 transfer to the hungry canyons account of the loess hills development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 140,000 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys transferred in subparagraph (1) may be used for administrative costs. c. Of the remaining amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, for use by the department in providing for soil and water conservation administration, the conservation of soil and water resources, or the support of soil and water conservation districts: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,185,000 d. Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âcâ that the department allocates to a soil and water conservation district, the first $15,000 may be expended by the district for the purpose of providing financial incentives under section 161A.73 to establish management practices for the control of soil erosion on land that is row-cropped, including but not limited to nontill planting, ridge-till planting, and contouring strip-cropping. Of any remaining amount of that appropriation allocated by the department to a district, 30 percent may be expended by the district for that same purpose. e. Not more than 5 percent of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ may be allocated for cost sharing to address complaints filed under section 161A.47 . f. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ, 5 percent shall be allocated for financial incentives to establish practices to protect watersheds above publicly owned lakes of the state from soil erosion and sediment as provided in section 161A.73 . g. The division of soil conservation and water quality created within the department pursuant to section 159.5 may allocate moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ to conduct research and demonstration projects to promote conservation tillage and nonpoint source pollution control practices. h. The allocation of moneys as financial incentives as provided in section 161A.73 may be used in combination with moneys allocated by the department of natural resources. i. Not more than 15 percent of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ may be used for costs of administration and Senate File 646, p. 16 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 5. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION ââ ADMINISTRATION a. For use by the department for costs of administration and implementation of soil and water conservation practices: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,800,000 b. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âaâ, $150,000 is allocated to support field staff providing technical assistance. Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES. There is appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 8.57A to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS For regular maintenance and operations of state parks and staff time associated with these activities: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,235,000 2. GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM (GIS) To provide local watershed managers with geographic information system data for their use in developing, monitoring, and displaying results of their watershed work: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,000 3. WATER QUALITY MONITORING For continuing the establishment and operation of water quality monitoring stations: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,955,000 4. PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY SYSTEM ACCOUNT For deposit in the public water supply system account of the water quality protection fund created in section 455B.183A : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 5. REGULATION OF ANIMAL FEEDING OPERATIONS For the regulation of animal feeding operations, including as provided for in chapters 459 , 459A , and 459B : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,320,000 6. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY For supporting floodplain management and dam safety: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 375,000 7. AMBIENT AIR QUALITY Senate File 646, p. 17 For the abatement, control, and prevention of ambient air pollution in this state, including measures as necessary to assure attainment and maintenance of ambient air quality standards from particulate matter: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 Sec. 19. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA ââ IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY. There is appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 8.57A to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY OPERATIONS For purposes of supporting the operations of the Iowa geological survey of the state as created within the state university of Iowa pursuant to section 456.1 , including but not limited to providing analysis; data maintenance, collection, and compilation; investigative programs; and information for water supply development and protection: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 2. WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT For purposes of supporting the Iowa geological survey in measuring, assessing, and evaluating the quantity of water sources in this state and assisting the department of natural resources in regulating water quantity as provided in chapter 455B, subchapter III, part 4 , pursuant to sections 455B.262B and 456.14 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 495,000 Sec. 20. REVERSION. 1. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ, and notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in this division of this Act that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year, or until the project for which the appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in this division of this Act to the department of agriculture and land stewardship Senate File 646, p. 18 to provide financial assistance for the establishment of permanent soil and water conservation practices that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028. 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to moneys transferred pursuant to this division of this Act to the loess hills development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 , which shall not revert as provided in that section. DIVISION VI ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 21. WATER QUALITY INITIATIVE ââ DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP. 1. There is appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For deposit in the water quality initiative fund created in section 466B.45 , for purposes of supporting the water quality initiative administered by the division of soil conservation and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,375,000 2. a. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used to support projects in subwatersheds as designated by the division that are part of high-priority watersheds identified by the water resources coordinating council established pursuant to section 466B.3 . b. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used to support projects in watersheds generally, including regional watersheds, as designated by the division and high-priority watersheds identified by the water resources coordinating council established pursuant to section 466B.3 . 3. In supporting projects in subwatersheds and watersheds as provided in subsection 2, all of the following apply: a. The demonstration projects shall utilize water quality Senate File 646, p. 19 practices as described in the Iowa nutrient reduction strategy as defined in section 455B.171 . b. The division shall implement demonstration projects as provided in paragraph âaâ by providing for participation by persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used in farming. To every extent practical, the division shall provide for collaborative participation by such persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land located within the same subwatershed. c. The division shall implement a demonstration project on a cost-share basis as determined by the division. However, except for edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the amount shall not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of establishing the practice as determined by the division or 50 percent of the actual cost of establishing the practice, whichever is less. d. The demonstration projects shall be used to educate other persons about the feasibility and value of establishing similar water quality practices. The division shall promote field day events for purposes of allowing interested persons to establish water quality practices on their agricultural land. e. The division shall conduct water quality evaluations within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period after accumulating information from such evaluations, the division shall create an aggregated database of water quality practices. Any information identifying a person holding a legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural land shall be a confidential record under section 22.7 . 4. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used to support education and outreach in a manner that encourages persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used for farming to implement water quality practices, including the establishment of such practices in watersheds generally, and not limited to subwatersheds or high-priority watersheds. 5. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used to contract with persons to coordinate the implementation of efforts provided in this section. 6. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used by the department to support urban soil and water conservation Senate File 646, p. 20 efforts, which may include but are not limited to management practices related to bioretention, landscaping, the use of permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality restoration. The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share basis as provided in chapter 161A . 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in subsection 1 to carry out the provisions of this section on a cost-share basis in combination with other moneys available to the department from a state or federal source. 8. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in this section may be used to pay for the costs of administering and implementing the water quality initiative by the departmentâs division of soil conservation and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 and this section. DIVISION VII RESOURCES ENHANCEMENT AND PROTECTION ââ OPEN SPACES Sec. 22. REAP ââ IN LIEU OF GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION. In lieu of the standing appropriation in section 455A.18 , there is appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 8.57A to the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, to be allocated as provided in section 455A.19 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,000,000 Sec. 23. REAP ââ OPEN SPACES ACCOUNT ââ STATE PARK MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND FACILITY REFURBISHMENT. Notwithstanding section 455A.19, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ, subparagraph (1), of the moneys allocated to the open spaces account of the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund, up to $1,000,000 may be used by the department of natural resources for state park maintenance, development, operations, and facility refurbishment for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending on June 30, 2026. Sec. 24. Section 455A.18, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: a. For each fiscal year of the fiscal period beginning July 1, 1997, and ending June 30, 2026 2028 , there is appropriated from the general fund, to the Iowa resources Senate File 646, p. 21 enhancement and protection fund, the amount of twenty million dollars, to be used as provided in this chapter . However, in any fiscal year of the fiscal period, if moneys from the lottery are appropriated by the state to the fund, the amount appropriated under this subsection shall be reduced by the amount appropriated from the lottery. DIVISION VIII ANIMAL DISEASE PREPAREDNESS AND RESPONSE Sec. 25. IOWA ANIMAL DISEASE PREVENTION FUND ââ SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS. 1. a. There is appropriated from the Iowa animal disease prevention fund created in section 165.18, as amended by this Act, to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: (1) For purposes of purchasing and maintaining equipment to further the implementation of the foreign animal disease preparedness and response strategy developed under section 163.3C: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 (2) For purposes of assisting in the development of vaccines against foreign animal diseases by a company based in Iowa that develops livestock and other animal vaccines: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 (3) For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness and response fund created in section 163.3B for purposes designated in that section: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 (4) For purposes of upgrading information technology resources used by the department: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 450,000 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 2. There is appropriated from the Iowa animal disease prevention fund created in section 165.18, as amended by this Senate File 646, p. 22 Act, to Iowa state university of science and technology for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: a. To assist the college of veterinary medicine veterinary diagnostic laboratory in installing and moving equipment into its refurbished facility: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 b. (1) For deposit in the livestock disease research fund created in section 267.8: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 (2) Moneys appropriated under this paragraph shall be used by Iowa state university of science and technology to support animal disease research in areas of importance to livestock producers. Sec. 26. Section 159.5, subsection 11, paragraph a, subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended by striking the subparagraph. Sec. 27. Section 163.3B, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department and shall be used exclusively to develop, establish, and implement for the following purposes: a. Developing, establishing, and implementing a foreign animal disease preparedness and response strategy as described in section 163.3C , and shall not require further special authorization by the general assembly . b. Supporting activities related to animal health and disease response that strengthen the stateâs overall ability to prevent, prepare for, and respond to emerging or reemerging animal diseases, including but not limited to salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes. Sec. 28. Section 163.10, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 163.10 Quarantining or destroying animals. The department may quarantine or destroy any animal exposed to or afflicted with an infectious or contagious disease. However, cattle exposed to or infected with tuberculosis shall not be destroyed without the ownerâs consent, unless there Senate File 646, p. 23 are sufficient moneys to reimburse the owner for the cattle, which may be paid as an expense authorized as provided in section 163.15, from moneys in the brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication fund created in section 165.18, or from moneys made available by the United States department of agriculture. Sec. 29. Section 163.15, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. If the secretary of agriculture determines that the outbreak of the infectious or contagious disease tuberculosis among an animal population constitutes a threat to the general welfare or the public health of the inhabitants of this state, the secretary shall formulate a program of eradication which shall include the condemnation and destroying of the animals exposed to or afflicted with the disease tuberculosis. The program of eradication shall provide for the indemnification of owners of the livestock under this section , if there are no other sources of indemnification. The program shall not be effective until the program has been approved by the executive council. Sec. 30. Section 163.15, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 31. Section 163A.12, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 163A.12 Owner requesting test. If the owner requests the department to inspect and test breeding swine for brucellosis, and agrees to comply with the rules made by the department under section 163A.9 , the department may designate a veterinarian to make an inspection and test, with the expense to be paid as provided in section 164.6 for cattle brucellosis testing , but only to the extent the funds provided in that section are not required for the cattle testing program . Sec. 32. Section 164.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 164.6 Expense of test. The expense for an inspection and official test of a designated animal other than for bovine animals shall be borne by the owner. If the designated animal is a bovine animal, and the owner agrees to comply with and carry out the provisions Senate File 646, p. 24 of this chapter and the rules adopted by the department under section 164.4, the expense of the inspection and test shall may be borne by the United States department of agriculture , or by the department, or by the brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication fund or any combination of these sources . Sec. 33. Section 164.21, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. The owner shall may be indemnified to the extent that money is available in the brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication fund as created in section 165.18 and indemnification is also made by the United States department of agriculture. However, if the United States department of agriculture is unable to indemnify the owner, the department may indemnify the owner, if money is available. Sec. 34. Section 164.21, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 35. Section 165.2, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. The state of Iowa is declared to be and is established as an accredited area for the eradication of bovine tuberculosis from the dairy and breeding cattle of the state. It shall be the duty of the department to eradicate bovine tuberculosis in all of the counties of the state in the manner provided by law as it appears in this chapter . The department shall proceed with the examination, including the tuberculin test, of all such cattle as rapidly as practicable and as is consistent with efficient work , and as funds are available for paying the indemnities as provided by law . Sec. 36. Section 165.10, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 165.10 Examination by department. The department may at any time, on its own motion, make an examination of any herd , and in case animals are destroyed, the appraisement and payment shall be made as provided in this chapter . Sec. 37. Section 165.18, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 165.18 Brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication Iowa animal disease prevention fund. Senate File 646, p. 25 1. A brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication fund is created in the office of the secretary of agriculture, to be used together with state and federal funds available to pay: a. The indemnity and other expenses provided in this chapter . b. The indemnity as set out in section 164.21 and other expenses provided in chapter 164 . c. The expenses of the inspection and testing program provided in chapter 163A , but only to the extent that the moneys in the fund are not required for expenses incurred under chapter 164 or this chapter . d. Indemnities as provided in section 159.5, subsection 11 , but only to the extent that the moneys in the fund are not required to pay expenses under chapter 163A , chapter 164 , or this chapter . 2. If it appears to the secretary of agriculture that the balance in the fund on January 20 is insufficient to carry on the work in the state for the following fiscal year, the secretary shall notify the board of supervisors of each county to levy an amount sufficient to pay the expenses estimated to be incurred under subsection 1 for the following fiscal year, subject to a maximum levy of thirty-three and three-fourths cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of all taxable property in the county. 3. Not later than December 15 or June 15 of a year in which the tax is collected, the county treasurer shall transmit the amount of the tax levied and collected to the treasurer of state, who shall credit it to the brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication fund. 1. An Iowa animal disease prevention fund is created in the state treasury under the control and management of the department. 2. The fund shall include moneys appropriated by the general assembly credited to the fund. The fund may include other moneys available to and obtained or accepted by the department as provided in section 159.6A, including but not limited to the federal government, other public sources, or private sources. 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department to develop, establish, and implement an animal disease prevention Senate File 646, p. 26 strategy. 4. a. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert. Sec. 38. Section 165.26, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 165.26 Permitting test. Every owner of dairy or breeding cattle in the state shall permit the ownerâs cattle to be tested for tuberculosis as provided in this chapter , and shall confine the cattle in a proper place so that the examination and test can be applied. If the owner refuses to so confine the cattle the department may employ sufficient help to properly confine them and the expense of such help shall be paid by the owner or deducted from the indemnity if any is paid . Such owner shall comply with all the requirements for the establishment and maintenance of a tuberculosis-free accredited herd. Sec. 39. Section 331.512, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 40. Section 331.559, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 41. REPEAL. Sections 163.16, 165.6, and 165.8, Code 2025, are repealed. Sec. 42. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. There is transferred from the brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication fund created pursuant to section 165.18, Code 2025, to the Iowa animal disease prevention fund created pursuant to section 165.18, as amended by this Act, all unencumbered or unobligated moneys remaining on the effective date of this division of this Act. DIVISION IX PROCEEDS FROM SALES OF REAL PROPERTY ââ EXPENDITURES FOR STATE PARKS Sec. 43. Section 461A.32, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. The commission may sell or exchange such parts of public lands or structures under the jurisdiction of the commission as in its judgment may be undesirable for conservation purposes, Senate File 646, p. 27 excepting state-owned meandered lands already surveyed and platted at state expense as a conservation plan and project tentatively adopted and now in the process of rehabilitation and development authorized by a special legislative Act. The sale or exchange shall be made upon the terms, conditions , or considerations as the commission may approve, whereupon the secretary of state shall issue a patent therefor in the manner provided by law in other cases. Moneys generated from any such sale from a state park shall be deposited in the state conservation fund created in section 456A.17 and are appropriated to the department to be used exclusively for structure or infrastructure costs at the specific state park from which the moneys were generated. The proceeds of any other such sale or exchange shall become a part of the funds moneys to be expended under the provisions of this chapter . ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 646, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor